North Dakota statutes. TITLE 13 Debtor And Creditor Relationship
CHAPTER 13-03.1 Consumer Finance Act [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10]

13-03.1-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-02.
Administration and exemptions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-03.
Scope. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-04.
Procedure and judicial review. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-05.
Application and fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-06.
Investigation of application — Requirements for issuance of license — Denial of license — Public record. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-07.
Posting of license — Continuing license — Annual fee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-07.1.
Expiration and renewal of license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-08.
Place of business — Removal — Residence of borrower. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-09.
Revocation or suspension of license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-09.1.
Suspension and removal of consumer finance officers or employees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-10.
Records — Annual reports — Biennial report. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-11.
Examinations and investigations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-11.1.
Response to department requests. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-12.
Regulations and orders — Certified copies of official documents. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-13.
Advertising. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-14.
Other business in the same office — Business confined to licensed office. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-15.
Maximum charges permitted — Installment payments — Other charges. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-15.1.
Maximum charges permitted for loans not in excess of one thousand dollars — Refund — Installment payments — Permitted charges. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-16.
Requirements for making and payments of loans — Confessions of judgment — Incomplete instruments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-17.
Insurance — Insurance policies — Existing insurance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-18.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-19.
Short title. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-20.
Fraudulent practices. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-21.
Advance fees prohibited — Exception. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.

13-03.1-22.
Orders and injunctions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 10.